el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Ηλεκτρονικά μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων: Συστήματα αναπαραγωγής ήχου & βίντεο για μηχανοκίνητα οχήματα; Ενισχυτές ήχου μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων; Προσαρμογείς κασέτας μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων; Κασετόφωνα μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων; Ισοσταθμιστές & φίλτρα διαχωρισμού μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων; Κάμερες στάθμευσης μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων; Ηχεία αυτοκινήτου με μικρόφωνο; Ηχεία μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων; Ηχεία χαμηλών συχνοτήτων (σαμπγούφερ); Βάσεις οθονών βίντεο οχημάτων
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Автомобильная электроника: Автомобильные проигрыватели и встроенные системы; Автомобильные усилители; Автомобильные кассетные адаптеры; Автомобильные кассетные проигрыватели; Автомобильные эквалайзеры и кроссоверы; Автомобильные парковочные камеры; Автомобильные комплекты громкой связи; Автомобильные динамики; Автомобильные сабвуферы; Крепления для автомобильных видеомониторов
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Kfz-Elektronik: A/V-Player & im Armaturenbrett integrierte Systeme für Autos; Audioverstärker für Autos; Kassettenadapter; Kassettenspieler für Autos; Equalizer & Frequenzweichen für Autos; Parkkameras für Autos; Freisprechanlagen; Lautsprecher für Autos; Subwoofer für Autos; Halterungen für Kfz-Videomonitore
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Fordonselektronik: A/V-spelare och inbyggda system för motorfordon; Förstärkare till motorfordon; Kassettadaptrar för motorfordon; Kassettspelare för motorfordon; Equalizers och crossovers för motorfordon; Säkerhetskameror för motorfordon; Högtalartelefoner för motorfordon; Högtalare till motorfordon; Subwoofers för motorfordon; Monteringssatser för videoskärmar
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Електроника за моторни превозни средства: Автомобилни аудио-видео плейъри и вградени системи; Усилватели за моторни превозни средства; Адаптери за касети за моторни превозни средства; Касетофони за моторни превозни средства; Еквалайзери и кросоувъри за моторни превозни средства; Камери за паркиране на моторни превозни средства; Високоговорители за моторни превозни средства; Говорители за моторни превозни средства; Субуфери за моторни превозни средства; Стойки за видеомонитори за моторни превозни средства
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Componentes eletrónicos para veículos motorizados: Sistemas integrados no tablier e leitores A/V para veículos motorizados; Amplificadores para veículos motorizados; Adaptadores de cassetes para veículos motorizados; Leitores de cassetes para veículos motorizados; Crossovers e equalizadores para veículos motorizados; Câmaras de estacionamento para veículos motorizados; Sistemas mãos-livres para veículos motorizados; Altifalantes para veículos motorizados; Subwoofers para veículos motorizados; Suportes de monitor de vídeo para veículos motorizados
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Électronique pour véhicules: Lecteurs et systèmes audio et vidéo intégrés pour véhicules; Amplificateurs pour véhicules; Adaptateurs de cassettes pour véhicules; Lecteurs de cassettes pour véhicules; Égaliseurs et répartiteurs pour véhicules; Caméras de recul; Kits mains-libres pour véhicules; Haut-parleurs pour véhicules; Caissons de basse pour véhicules; Supports d'écrans vidéo pour véhicules
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Elektronika motorových vozidiel: A/V prehrávače a palubné systémy motorových vozidiel; Zosilňovače motorových vozidiel; Kazetové adaptéry pre motorové vozidlá; Kazetové prehrávače pre motorové vozidlá; Ekvalizéry a crossovery pre motorové vozidlá; Parkovacie kamery pre motorové vozidlá; Handsfree sada do motorových vozidiel; Reproduktory do motorových vozidiel; Subwoofery do motorových vozidiel; Držiaky na video monitor do motorových vozidiel
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Gépjármű-elektronika: Gépjármű A/V lejátszók és műszerfali rendszerek; Gépjármű-erősítők; Gépjármű kazettás adapterek; Gépjármű kazettás lejátszók; Gépjármű-kiegyenlítők és keresztváltók; Gépjármű-parkolókamerák; Gépjármű-kihangosító; Gépjárműhangszórók; Gépjárműmélynyomó; Gépjárművideómonitor-rögzítők
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 車載用電子機器: カーオーディオ・インダッシュシステム; 車載用アンプ; 車載用カセットアダプター; 車載用カセットプレーヤー; 車載用イコライザー・クロスオーバー; 車載用バックカメラ; 車載用スピーカーフォン; 車載用スピーカー; 車載用サブウーファー; 車載用ビデオモニタースタンド
es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Material electrónico para vehículos motorizados: Sistemas de entretenimiento a bordo y reproductores AV para vehículos; Amplificadores para automóviles; Adaptadores de casetes para automóviles; Radiocasetes para automóviles; Crossovers y ecualizadores para coches; Cámaras de seguridad para automóviles; Manos libres para automóviles; Altavoces para automóviles; Altavoz de subwoofer para automóviles; Soportes para monitores de vídeo para vehículos motorizados
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Elektronika za motorna vozila: Avdio/video predvajalniki in vgradni sistemi za motorna vozila; Avtoojačevalci; Kasetni adapterji za motorna vozila; Kasetofoni za motorna vozila; Izenačevalniki in delilniki za motorna vozila; Kamere za vzvratno vožnjo; Zvočnik za prostoročno telefoniranje v vozilu; Zvočniki za motorna vozila; Nizkotonski zvočniki motorna vozila; Stojala za montažo videomonitorjev v vozilih
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 机动车电子产品: 车载影音播放器/嵌入式辅助系统; 车载功放; 车载盒式磁带适配器; 车载磁带播放器; 车载音响均衡器; 后视摄像头; 车载免提电话; 车载扬声器; 汽车重低音扬声器; 汽车视频监视器支架
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Motorinių transporto priemonių elektronika: Motorinių transporto priemonių garso ir vaizdo grotuvai ir prietaisų skydelyje integruojamos sistemos; Motorinių transporto priemonių stiprintuvai; Motorinių transporto priemonių kasečių adapteriai; Motorinių transporto priemonių kasečių grotuvai; Motorinių transporto priemonių glodintuvai ir krosoveriai; Motorinių transporto priemonių statymo kameros; Motorinių transporto priemonių garsiakalbiniai telefonai; Motorinių transporto priemonių garsiakalbiai; Motorinių transporto priemonių žemųjų dažnių garsiakalbiai; Motorinių transporto priemonių vaizdo monitorių laikikliai
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Componente electronice pentru autovehicule: Playere A/V și sisteme de bord pentru autovehicule; Amplificatoare pentru autovehicule; Adaptoare casete pentru autovehicule; Casetofoane pentru autovehicule; Egalizatoare și instalații crossover pentru autovehicule; Camere video pentru parcarea autovehiculelor; Telefoane pentru autovehicule; Difuzoare pentru autovehicule; Difuzoare subwoofer pentru autovehicule; Suporturi cameră video pentru autovehicule
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Elektronik til motorkøretøjer: A/V-afspillere og integrerede systemer i motorkøretøjer; Forstærkere til motorkøretøjer; Kassettebåndsadaptere til motorkøretøjer; Kassettebåndsafspillere til motorkøretøjer; Equalizere og crossovere til motorkøretøjer; Parkeringskameraer til motorkøretøjer; Højttalertelefoner til motorkøretøjer; Højttalere til motorkøretøjer; Subwoofere til motorkøretøjer; Holdere til montering af videoskærme i motorkøretøjer
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Wyposażenie elektroniczne pojazdów silnikowych: Samochodowe odtwarzacze AV i systemy do montażu w desce rozdzielczej; Wzmacniacze samochodowe; Adaptery kasetowe; Odtwarzacze kasetowe; Korektory i zwrotnice; Kamery parkowania; Zestawy głośnomówiące; Głośniki samochodowe; Subwoofery; Mocowania do samochodowych monitorów wideo
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Elektronica voor motorvoertuigen: Inbouw-audio- en videospelers voor motorvoertuigen; Versterkers voor motorvoertuigen; Cassetteadapters voor motorvoertuigen; Cassettespelers voor motorvoertuigen; Equalizers en cross-overs voor motorvoertuigen; Parkeercamera's voor motorvoertuigen; Luidsprekertelefoons voor motorvoertuigen; Luidsprekers voor motorvoertuigen; Subwoofers voor motorvoertuigen; Videomonitorsteunen voor motorvoertuigen
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > Thiết bị điện tử xe cơ giới: Hệ thống bảng điều khiển điện tử và đầu phát âm thanh/video trên xe; Bộ khuếch đại xe cơ giới; Bộ chuyển đổi chức năng đài cát xét trên mô tô; Máy cát xét cho xe có động cơ; Bộ bù và lọc tần số âm thanh xe cơ giới; Camera đậu xe; Loa đàm thoại chuyên dụng cho ô tô; Loa xe cơ giới; Loa siêu trầm xe cơ giới; Giá treo màn hình video trên xe cơ giới
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Elektronika za motorna vozila: A/V uređaji i unutarnje kontrolne ploče za motorna vozila; Pojačala za motorna vozila; Adapteri kazeta za motorna vozila; Kazetofoni za motorna vozila; Ekvilajzeri i crossoveri za motorna vozila; Kamere za parkiranje; Telefonski zvučnici za motorna vozila; Zvučnici za motorna vozila; Subwooferi za motorna vozila; Nosači videomonitora za motorna vozila
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Elettronica per veicoli a motore: Sistemi da cruscotto e lettori audio/video per auto; Amplificatori per veicoli; Adattatori a cassetta per veicoli; Mangianastri per veicoli; Equalizzatori e crossover per veicoli; Telecamere di parcheggio per veicoli; Vivavoce per auto; Altoparlanti per veicoli; Subwoofer per veicoli; Staffe per monitor video per veicoli a motore
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 汽機車電子裝置: 車用影音播放系統; 汽機車用擴大機; 車用卡帶音源轉換器; 車用卡式播放器; 汽機車用等化器/分音器; 汽機車停車輔助攝影機; 車用免持擴音器; 汽機車喇叭; 機動車輛低音喇叭; 汽機車用螢幕支架
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > วงจรอิเล็กทรอนิกส์ในรถยนต์: เครื่องเล่น A/V สำหรับยานยนต์และระบบในแผงหน้าปัด; แอมพลิฟายเออร์บนรถยนต์; อะแดปเตอร์เทปสำหรับยานยนต์; เครื่องเล่นเทปสำหรับยานยนต์; อีควอไลเซอร์และครอสโอเวอร์ของรถยนต์; กล้องมองหลังติดรถยนต์; สปีกเกอร์โฟนสำหรับยานยนต์; ลำโพงรถยนต์; ลำโพงซับวูฟเฟอร์รถยนต์; ที่ติดตั้งจอในรถยนต์
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Motor Vehicle Electronics: Motor Vehicle A/V Players & In-Dash Systems; Motor Vehicle Amplifiers; Motor Vehicle Cassette Adapters; Motor Vehicle Cassette Players; Motor Vehicle Equalizers & Crossovers; Motor Vehicle Parking Cameras; Motor Vehicle Speakerphones; Motor Vehicle Speakers; Motor Vehicle Subwoofers; Motor Vehicle Video Monitor Mounts
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Motorlu Taşıt Elektronik Sistemleri: Motorlu Araç A/V Oynatıcıları ve Ekranlı Teyp Sistemleri; Motorlu Araç Amfileri; Motorlu Araç Kaset Adaptörleri; Motorlu Araç Kaset Çalarları; Motorlu Araç Ekolayzırları ve Crossover'ları; Motorlu Araç Güvenlik Kameraları; Motorlu Araç Mikrofonlu Kulaklıkları; Motorlu Araç Hoparlörleri; Motorlu Araç Subwoofer'ları; Motorlu Taşıt Video Monitörü Tutacakları
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Elektronika vozidel: Hudební a video přehrávače do motorových vozidel a palubní počítače; Zesilovače do vozidel; Kazetové adaptéry do vozidel; Kazetové přehrávače do vozidel; Ekvalizéry a výhybky do vozidel; Parkovací kamery pro motorová vozidla; Soupravy handsfree do vozidel; Reproduktory do vozidel; Subwoofery do vozidel; Držáky monitorů do vozidel
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Eletrônicos para veículos motorizados: Sistemas embutidos e players A/V para veículos motorizados; Amplificadores de áudio para veículos motorizados; Adaptadores para fita cassete para veículos motorizados; Toca-fitas para veículos motorizados; Equalizadores e crossovers para veículos motorizados; Câmeras de estacionamento para veículos motorizados; Aparelho de viva-voz para veículos motorizados; Alto-falantes para veículos motorizados; Subwoofers para veículos motorizados; Suportes de monitor de vídeo para veículos motorizados
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 자동차 전자 장치: 자동차 A/V 플레이어/인대시 시스템; 자동차 앰프; 자동차 카세트 어댑터; 자동차용 카세트 플레이어; 자동차 이퀄라이저/크로스오버; 자동차 후방 카메라; 자동차 스피커폰; 자동차 스피커; 자동차 서브우퍼; 자동차 비디오 모니터 마운트
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Kjøretøyelektronikk: A/V-spillere og dashboardsystemer for kjøretøy; Kjøretøyforsterkere; Kassettadaptere til kjøretøy; Kassettspillere til kjøretøy; Equalizere og crossovere til kjøretøy; Parkeringskameraer til kjøretøy; Høyttalertelefoner til kjøretøy; Kjøretøyhøyttalere; Subwoofere til kjøretøy; Videoskjermfester til kjøretøy
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Moottoriajoneuvojen elektroniikka: Moottoriajoneuvojen mediasoittimet ja kojelautajärjestelmät; Moottoriajoneuvojen vahvistimet; Moottoriajoneuvojen kasettiadapterit; Moottoriajoneuvojen kasettisoittimet; Moottoriajoneuvojen taajuusmuuntimet ja jakosuodattimet; Moottoriajoneuvojen pysäköintikamerat; Moottoriajo­neuvojen kaiutinpuhelimet; Moottoriajo­neuvojen kaiuttimet; Moottoriajoneuvojen bassokaiuttimet; Moottoriajoneuvojen videonäyttöjen telineet